Wyoming, session 2025, SF0049.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 39-13-103(b)(ii) is amended to read:
39-13-103. Imposition.
(b) Basis of tax. The following shall apply:
(ii) All taxable property shall be annually
valued at its fair market value. Except as otherwise
provided by law for specific property, the department shall
prescribe by rule and regulation the appraisal methods and
systems for determining fair market value using generally
accepted appraisal standards. For tangible personal
property, fair market value shall be determined using
valuation indexes and depreciation schedules prescribed by
rule and regulation of the department. Once the tangible
personal property reaches the depreciation floor, the
trending factor shall remain constant for subsequent years
until the property is removed from service. As used in this
paragraph, "depreciation floor" means twenty percent (20%)
of the reported installed cost of the property. As used in
this paragraph, "tangible personal property" excludes any
property that is valued under W.S. 39-13-102(m) and mobile
homes required to be titled under W.S. 31-2-501 through
31-2-508;
Section 2. The department of revenue shall promulgate
all rules necessary to implement this act.
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0049
ENROLLED ACT NO. 8, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 3.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of
this section, this act is effective January 1, 2026.
(b) Sections 2 and 3 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
2